Utah statutes.
46-4-204.   Effect of change or error.
(1)  If a change or error in an electronic record occurs in a transmission
between parties to a transaction, the following rules apply:
(a)  If the parties have agreed to use a security procedure to detect changes
or errors and one party has conformed to the procedure, but the other party
has not, and the nonconforming party would have detected the change or error
had that party also conformed, the conforming party may avoid the effect of
the changed or erroneous electronic record.
(b)  In an automated transaction involving an individual, the individual may
avoid the effect of an electronic record that resulted from an error made by
the individual in dealing with the electronic agent of another person if the
electronic agent did not provide an opportunity for the prevention or
correction of the error and, at the time the individual learns of the error,
the individual:
(i)  promptly notifies the other person of the error and that the individual
did not intend to be bound by the electronic record received by the other
person;
(ii)  takes reasonable steps, including steps that conform to the other
person's reasonable instructions, to return to the other person or, if
instructed by the other person, to destroy the consideration received, if any,
as a result of the erroneous electronic record; and
(iii)  has not used or received any benefit or value from the consideration,
if any, received from the other person.
(2)  If neither Subsection (1)(a) or (b) applies, the change or error has the
effect provided by other law, including the law of mistake, and the parties'
contract, if any.
(3)  Subsections (1)(b) and (2) may not be varied by agreement.
